Massachusetts, session 194th, H2874.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 18 of chapter 32A of the General Laws is amended by inserting at
the end thereof the following sentences:-
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, all retirees, their spouses and
dependents, who are insured or eligible to be insured under sections five, ten B and twelve, age
65 or over and not eligible for coverage under medicare part A at no cost to the retiree, spouse,
or dependent, shall be transferred by the commission to medicare part A and part B; provided,
that the commission shall pay the medicare part A premium and any medicare part A or part B
premium penalty assessed by the federal government on said retirees, spouses and dependents as
result of transfer into medicare. Each retiree, to be transferred, shall: (a) provide the commission,
in such form as the commission shall prescribe, such information as is necessary to transfer to
of 2

medicare Part A and Part B, and (b) enroll in a medicare health benefits supplement plan offered
by the commission under section ten C or section fourteen; provided, that benefits under said
plan and medicare part A and part B together shall be of comparable actuarial value to those
under the retiree's existing coverage.
SECTION 2. The commission shall transfer retirees, their spouses and dependents, in
accordance with section 1 of this act, on or before July 1, 2026.
of 2